Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2372.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2802 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2802. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:* * *(22) Since continuing and ensuring the reliability of electric services depends on adequate generation and conscientious development and maintenance of transmission and distribution systems, hyperscale data centers built in this Commonwealth shall pay their own costs for energy and connecting infrastructure, including bringing their own 123456789101112131415161718 baseload generation onto the grid and building necessary infrastructure to connect their generation and facilities to the grid no matter how attenuated those infrastructure needs may be from the actual site of the facility.Section 2. Section 2804(1) introductory paragraph of Title 66 is amended and the paragraph is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 2804. Standards for restructuring of electric industry.The following interdependent standards shall govern the commission's assessment and approval of each public utility's restructuring plan, oversight of the transition process and regulation of the restructured electric utility industry:(1) The commission shall ensure the continuation of safe and reliable electric service to all consumers in [the] this Commonwealth, including:* * *(iii) That hyperscale data centers built in this Commonwealth shall provide their own baseload generation which shall consist of new generation build or repurposing previously retired generation assets which may be refitted to comply with existing law. The following shall apply:(A) Baseload generation shall be built in this Commonwealth.(B) Hyperscale data centers shall pay their own costs for interconnecting with transmission and distribution systems regardless of the proximity of those costs to the data center and the generation facility.(C) The commission shall determine what 20260HB2372PN3161 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constitutes a hyperscale data center in terms of generation requirements.* * *Section 3. Section 2807(e)(3.2)(iii) of Title 66 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies.* * *(e) Obligation to serve.--A default service provider's obligation to provide electric generation supply service following the expiration of a generation rate cap specified under section 2804(4) (relating to standards for restructuring of electric industry) or a restructuring plan under section 2806(f) is revised as follows:* * *(3.2) The electric power procured pursuant to paragraph (3.1) shall include a prudent mix of the following:* * *(iii) Long-term purchase contracts with Pennsylvania electric generators, entered into as a result of an auction, request for proposal or bilateral contract that is free of undue influence, duress or favoritism, of more than four and not more than 20 years. The default service provider shall have sole discretion to determine the source and fuel type. Long-term purchase contracts under this subparagraph [may not constitute more than 25% of the default service provider's projected default service load unless the commission, after a hearing, determines for good cause that a greater portion of load is necessary to] are subject to a determination by the commission, after a hearing, that the contracts are in 20260HB2372PN3161 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the public interest and achieve least cost procurement. This subparagraph shall not apply to contracts executed under paragraph (5).* * *(f.1) Hyperscale data center integration.--(1) Each electric distribution company shall cooperate with the development and deployment of hyperscale data centers to facilitate siting, infrastructure planning and expedited interconnection, including:(i) Facilitating the interconnection of customer-owned or third-party-owned generation assets located on or adjacent to the hyperscale data center site.(ii) Incorporating projected hyperscale data center loads into long-term infrastructure and capital improvement plans submitted to the commission.(iii) Prohibiting cross-subsidization with other rate classes serviced by the electric distribution company.(iv) Ensuring that the hyperscale data center pays all costs associated with the development and deployment of their facilities and infrastructure.(2) So as not to cause undue burden or delay on the development of new electricity resources required by section 2804(1)(iii) , the commission shall establish compliance deadlines specifically tailored to expedite the electric distribution company cooperation in the development of hyperscale data center infrastructure required under paragraph (1).(3) Nothing in this subsection may affect the zoning authority of a municipality.20260HB2372PN3161 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2372PN3161 - 5 - 12